algorithms/polish.sbl
/* Based on the Polish stemming algorithm developed by Błażej Kubiński,
 * which can be found at https://github.com/Tutanchamon/pl_stemmer.
 *
 * The first Snowball implementation was written by Tomasz Łysiak, rewritten
 * and modified by Dmitry Shachnev.
 */

stringescapes {}

stringdef ak '{U+0105}' // ą a + ogonek
stringdef ek '{U+0119}' // ę e + ogonek
stringdef l/ '{U+0142}' // ł l + stroke
stringdef s' '{U+015b}' // ś s + acute (kreska)
stringdef c' '{U+0107}' // ć c + acute (kreska)
stringdef o' '{U+00f3}' // ó o + acute (kreska)


externals (stem)


routines (
  mark_regions
  remove_nouns
  remove_diminutive
  remove_superlative_ends
  remove_adjective_ends
  remove_verbs_ends
  remove_adverbs_ends
  remove_plural_forms
  remove_general_ends
)

integers ( pV p1 )

groupings ( v )

define v 'a{ak}e{ek}io{o'}uy'


define mark_regions as (
  $pV = limit
  $p1 = limit

  do (
    gopast v     setmark pV
    gopast non-v setmark p1
  )
)

backwardmode (
  define remove_nouns as (
    setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring]) among (
      'ach'  // plural locative
      'ami'  // plural instrumental
      'nia'  // genitive of words ending with -nie, e.g. czytanie - czytania
      'niu'  // dative/locative of words ending with -nie, e.g. czytanie - czytaniu
      'cia'  // genitive of words ending with -cie, e.g. ukrycie - ukrycia
      'ciu'  // dative/locative of words ending with -cie, e.g. ukrycie - ukryciu
      'ce'   // dative/locative of words ending with -ka, e.g. muzyka - muzyce
      // Verbal nouns, e.g. czytanie, narodzenie.
      'anie' 'enie'  // nominative
      'aniu' 'eniu'  // dative/locative
      // Borrowed words that match English -ation, e.g. fortyfikacja (fortification).
      'acja'     // nominative
      'acji'     // genitive/dative/locative
      'acj{ak}'  // accusative
        (delete)
      // Borrowed words that match English -tics, e.g. lingwistyka (linguistics).
      'tyka'
        (<- 'ty')
      // Borrowed words that match English -tion, e.g. intencja (intention).
      'cja'     // nominative
      'cji'     // genitive/dative/locative
      'cj{ak}'  // accusative
        (<- 'c')
    )
  )

  define remove_diminutive as (
    setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring]) among (
      'eczek' 'eczka' 'eczkowi' 'eczkiem' 'eczku'      // e.g. człowieczek (diminutive of człowiek)
      'eczki' 'eczk{o'}w' 'eczkom' 'eczkami' 'eczkach' // plural
      'iczek' 'iczka' 'iczkowi' 'iczkiem' 'iczku'      // e.g. czajniczek (diminutive of czajnik)
      'iczki' 'iczk{o'}w' 'iczkom' 'iczkami' 'iczkach' // plural
      'iszek' 'iszka' 'iszkowi' 'iszkiem' 'iszku'      // e.g. braciszek (diminutive of brat)
      'iszki' 'iszk{o'}w' 'iszkom' 'iszkami' 'iszkach' // plural
      'aszek' 'aszka' 'aszkowi' 'aszkiem' 'aszku'      // e.g. młodzieniaszek (diminutive of młodzieniec)
      'aszki' 'aszk{o'}w' 'aszkom' 'aszkami' 'aszkach' // plural
      'uszek' 'uszka' 'uszkowi' 'uszkiem' 'uszku'      // e.g. kwiatuszek (diminutive of kwiat)
      'uszki' 'uszk{o'}w' 'uszkom' 'uszkami' 'uszkach' // plural
      'ek'     // e.g. ogródek (diminutive of ogród)
      'ak'     // e.g. gęsiak (diminutive of gęś)
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define remove_adjective_ends as (
    setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring]) among (
      // declension of words with -ow- d-suffix, e.g. bobrowy
      'owy' 'owego' 'owemu' 'owym'  // masculine
      'owa' 'owej' 'ow{ak}'         // feminine
      'owe'                         // neuter
      'owi' 'owych' 'owymi'         // plural
      // general adjective endings
      'ych'  // genitive/accusative/locative plural
      'ego'  // genitive/accusative singular (masculine)
      'emu'  // dative singular (masculine/neuter)
      'ej'   // genitive/dative/locative singular (feminine)
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define remove_verbs_ends as (
    do (
      setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring]) among (
        // conditionals:
        'bym'        // 1st person singular, e.g. czytał(a)bym
        'by{s'}'     // 2nd person singular, e.g. czytał(a)byś
        'by{s'}my'   // 1st person plural, e.g. czytalibyśmy
        'by{s'}cie'  // 2nd person plural, e.g. czytalibyście
        'by'         // 3rd person singular/plural, e.g. czytał(a)by, czytaliby
          (delete)
      )
    )
    setlimit tomark pV for ([substring]) among (
      'asz'  'esz'   // present 2nd person singular, e.g. czytasz, piszesz
      'amy'  'emy'   // present 1st person plural, e.g. czytamy, piszemy
      'acie' 'ecie'  // present 2nd person plural, e.g. czytacie, piszecie
      'cie'          // imperative 2nd person plural, e.g. czytajcie, chodźcie
      'e{s'}{c'}'    // infinitive, e.g. przynieść
      'a{s'}{c'}'    // infinitive, e.g. popaść
      'a{c'}'        // infinitive, e.g. czytać
      'e{c'}'        // infinitive, e.g. chcieć
      'i{c'}'        // infinitive, e.g. wozić
      '{ak}{c'}'     // infinitive, e.g. marznąć
      'a{l/}em'       'i{l/}em' 'em'  // past 1st person singular masculine, e.g. czytałem, chodziłem, marzłem
      'a{l/}am'       'i{l/}am' 'am'  // past 1st person singular feminine, e.g. czytałam, chodziłam, marzłam
      'a{l/}e{s'}'    'i{l/}e{s'}'    // past 2nd person singular masculine, e.g. czytałeś, chodziłeś
      'a{l/}a{s'}'    'i{l/}a{s'}'    // past 2nd person singular feminine, e.g. czytałaś, chodziłaś
      'a{l/}'         'i{l/}'         // past 3rd person singular masculine, e.g. czytał, chodził
      'a{l/}a'        'i{l/}a'        // past 3rd person singular feminine, e.g. czytała, chodziła
      'a{l/}o'        'i{l/}o'        // past 3rd person singular neuter, e.g. czytało, chodziło
      'ali{s'}my'     'ili{s'}my'     // past 1st person plural virile, e.g. czytaliśmy, chodziliśmy
      'a{l/}y{s'}my'  'i{l/}y{s'}my'  // past 1st person plural nonvirile, e.g. czytałyśmy, chodziłyśmy
      'ali{s'}cie'    'ili{s'}cie'    // past 2nd person plural virile, e.g. czytaliście, chodziliście
      'a{l/}y{s'}cie' 'i{l/}y{s'}cie' // past 2nd person plural nonvirile, e.g. czytałyście, chodziłyście
      'ali'           'ili'           // past 3rd person plural virile, e.g. czytali, chodzili
      'a{l/}y'        'i{l/}y'        // past 3rd person plural nonvirile, e.g. czytały, chodziły
      '{ak}c'      // contemporary adverbial participle (transgressive), e.g. czytając
      // different forms of active adjectival participle, e.g. czytający (one who is reading)
      '{ak}cy'     // nominative singular (masculine)
      '{ak}cego'   // genitive singular (masculine/neuter)
      '{ak}cemu'   // dative singular (masculine)
      '{ak}cym'    // instrumental/locative singular (masculine)
      '{ak}ca'     // nominative singular (feminine)
      '{ak}cej'    // genitive/dative/locative singular (feminine)
      '{ak}c{ak}'  // accusative singular (feminine)
      '{ak}ce'     // nominative/accusative singular (neuter)
      '{ak}cych'   // genitive plural
      '{ak}cymi'   // instrumental plural
        (delete)
      'aj'     // imperative, e.g. czytaj
         (<- 'a')
    )
  )

  define remove_adverbs_ends as (
    setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring]) among (
      'nie'  // e.g. dokładnie
        (<- 'n')
      'wie'  // e.g. możliwie
        (<- 'w')
      'rze'  // e.g. dobrze
        (<- 'r')
    )
  )

  define remove_plural_forms as (
    setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring]) among (
      '{o'}w'  // genitive plural, e.g. włos - włosów
      'om'     // dative plural, e.g. włos - włosom
      'ami'    // instrumental plural, e.g. włos - włosami
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define remove_general_ends as (
    setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring]) among (
      // These vowel endings can appear in different contexts
      'ia'    // e.g. słonia (genitive singular of słoń)
      'ie'    // e.g. słonie (nominative plural of słoń)
      'u'     // e.g. stołu (genitive singular of stół)
      '{ak}'  // e.g. książką (noun, instrumental) or piszą (verb, present 3rd person plural)
      '{ek}'  // e.g. książkę (noun, accusative) or piszę (verb, present 1st person singular)
      'i'     // e.g. książki (nominative plural of książka)
      'a'     // e.g. kobieta (nominative singular)
      'y'     // e.g. kobiety (nominative plural of kobieta)
      '{l/}'  // e.g. napadł (past 3rd person singular masculine of napaść)
        (delete)
    )
  )
)

define remove_superlative_ends as (
  test (
    ['naj'] (
      backwards (
        [substring] among (
          'sze'    // adverb, e.g. w najlepsze
          'szy'    // nominative singular (masculine), e.g. najlepszy
          'sza'    // nominative singular (feminine), e.g. najlepsza
          'sz{ak}' // accusative singular (feminine), e.g. najlepszą
          'szych'  // genitive plural, e.g. najlepszych
          'szego'  // genitive/accusative singular (masculine), e.g. najlepszego
          'szemu'  // dative singular (masculine/neuter), e.g. najlepszemu
          'szym'   // instrumental/locative singular (masculine/neuter), e.g. najlepszym
          'szej'   // genitive/dative/locative singular (feminine), e.g. najlepszej
            (delete)
        )
      )
    )
  )
  [tomark sizeof 'naj'] delete
)

define stem as (
  do mark_regions
  backwards (
    do remove_nouns
    do remove_diminutive
  )
  remove_superlative_ends or (backwards do remove_adjective_ends)
  backwards (
    do remove_verbs_ends
    do remove_adverbs_ends
    do remove_plural_forms
    do remove_general_ends
  )
)
